Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.570

Other authority retained.

This chapter does not affect the ability of a law enforcement officer to remove a firearm or concealed pistol license from any person or to conduct any search and seizure for firearms pursuant to other lawful authority.

[ 2021 c 215 s 69.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.